Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4814.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [471.372] NONDISCLOSURE AGREEMENTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Data center" has the meaning given in section 216B.02, subdivision 11. new text end new text begin (c) "Local elected official" means a member of a city council, mayor, county commissioner, watershed district manager, town supervisor, and any other elected official established by a home rule charter. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Nondisclosure agreements restricted. new text end new text begin (a) A local elected official must not enter into a nondisclosure agreement or other contract restricting public disclosure of information about a potential data center development within the boundaries of the political subdivision represented by the official. new text end new text begin (b) Any agreement or contract or term of an agreement or contract that violates paragraph (a) is void and unenforceable. new text end new text begin (c) When a contract contains a provision that is void and unenforceable under paragraph (b), that provision must be severed from the other provisions of the contract to the extent that it is void and unenforceable. The fact that the provision is void and unenforceable does not affect the other provisions of the contract. new text end new text begin (d) If a local elected official enters a contract or agreement that violates paragraph (a), the official must publicly disclose the contract or agreement. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to agreements entered into on or after that date. new text end